ja: キルティング定規の目盛り: 角度線; 境界/測定目盛りのみ; 円/円弧ガイド; 対角中心線; グリッド線; 複数の対角線; 縫い代ガイド; スクエアアップガイド; ストリップカットガイド; その他
da: Quiltelineal-markeringer: Vinkellinjer; Kun kant-/målemarkeringer; Cirkel-/bueguider; Diagonal midterlinje; Gitterlinjer; Flere diagonale linjer; Sømrumsguider; Renskæringsguider; Guider til strimmelskæring; Andet
lt-LT: Skiautinių liniuotės žymėjimai: Kampų linijos; Tik kraštų / matavimo žymos; Apskritimų / lankų kreipikliai; Įstriža centrinė linija; Tinklelio linijos; Kelių įstrižainių linijos; Siūlių užlaidų kreipikliai; Kvadratų formavimo kreipikliai; Juostų pjovimo kreipikliai; Kita
en: Quilting ruler markings: Angle lines; Border/measurement tick marks only; Circle/arc guides; Diagonal center line; Grid lines; Multiple diagonal lines; Seam allowance guides; Square-up guides; Strip cutting guides; Other
es: Marcas de la regla para acolchado: Líneas de ángulo; Solo marcas de borde/medición; Guías de círculo/arco; Línea central diagonal; Líneas de cuadrícula; Múltiples líneas diagonales; Guías de margen de costura; Guías de encuadre; Guías de corte de tiras; Otra
fi: Tikkausviivaimen merkinnät: Kulmalinjat; Vain reuna-/mittamerkinnät; Ympyrä-/kaarileikkuun ohjaimet; Diagonaalinen keskilinja; Ruudukon viivat; Useita diagonaalisia linjoja; Saumavaran ohjaimet; Suoristusohjaimet; Suikaleiden leikkausohjaimet; Muu
el: Διαγραμμίσεις χάρακα quilting: Γραμμές γωνίας; Μόνο σημάδια περιγράμματος/μέτρησης; Οδηγοί κύκλου/τόξου; Διαγώνια κεντρική γραμμή; Γραμμές πλέγματος; Πολλαπλές διαγώνιες γραμμές; Οδηγοί περιθωρίου ραφής; Οδηγοί τετραγωνισμού; Οδηγοί κοπής λωρίδων; Άλλο
hr-HR: Oznake na ravnalu za prošivanje: Linije kuta; Samo kvačice za obrub/mjerenje; Vodilice za krugove/lukove; Dijagonalna središnja linija; Linije mreže; Višestruke dijagonalne linije; Vodilice za dodatke za šav; Vodilice za poravnanje (kvadriranje); Vodilice za rezanje traka; Ostalo
th: เครื่องหมายบนไม้บรรทัดสำหรับงานควิลท์: เส้นวัดมุม; มีเฉพาะขอบ/ขีดวัดระยะ; เส้นนำทางวงกลม/ส่วนโค้ง; เส้นทแยงมุมกึ่งกลาง; เส้นกริด; เส้นทแยงมุมหลายเส้น; เส้นนำทางเผื่อเย็บ; เส้นนำทางจัดรูปทรงสี่เหลี่ยม; เส้นนำทางตัดริ้วผ้า; อื่นๆ
nb: Linjalmarkeringer for stikksøm: Vinkellinjer; Kun kant-/målemerker; Sirkel-/bueguider; Diagonal midtlinje; Rutenettslinjer; Flere diagonale linjer; Sømmonnguider; Renskjæringsguider; Strimmelskjæringsguider; Annet
pl: Oznaczenia linijki do patchworku: Linie kątowe; Tylko krawędzie / znaczniki pomiarowe; Prowadnice kół / łuków; Ukośna linia środkowa; Linie siatki; Wiele linii ukośnych; Prowadnice zapasów na szwy; Prowadnice do wyrównywania do kąta prostego; Prowadnice do cięcia pasów; Inne
sv: Quiltningslinjalens markeringar: Vinkellinjer; Endast kant-/mätmarkeringar; Cirkel-/bågguider; Diagonal mittlinje; Rutnätslinjer; Flera diagonala linjer; Sömsmånsguider; Fyrkantsguider; Guider för remskärning; Övrigt
it: Segni del righello per il quilting: Linee angolari; Solo tacche di misurazione/sui bordi; Guide per cerchi/archi; Linea centrale diagonale; Linee della griglia; Linee diagonali multiple; Guide per margini di cucitura; Guide di squadratura; Guide per taglio a strisce; Altro
sl-SI: Oznake na ravnilu za prešivanje: Kotne črte; Samo obrobe/merilne oznake; Vodila za kroge/loke; Diagonalna sredinska črta; Mrežne črte; Več diagonalnih črt; Vodila za dodatek za šiv; Vodila za poravnavo robov; Vodila za rezanje trakov; Drugo
fr: Repères de règle de patchwork: Lignes d’angle; Marques de bordure/mesure uniquement; Guides de cercle/arc; Ligne centrale diagonale; Lignes de grille; Lignes diagonales multiples; Guides de surplus de couture; Guides d’équerrage; Guides de coupe en bandes; Autre
zh-CN: 拼布尺刻度标记: 角度线; 仅边框/测量刻度; 圆形/弧形引导线; 对角中心线; 网格线; 多条对角线; 缝份引导线; 裁方引导线; 裁条引导线; 其他
vi: Vạch chia thước may chần: Đường góc; Chỉ vạch đánh dấu viền/đo lường; Thước canh hình tròn/hình cung; Đường chéo trung tâm; Đường kẻ lưới; Nhiều đường chéo; Thước canh lề đường may; Thước canh góc vuông; Thước canh cắt dải vải; Khác
zh-TW: 拼布尺刻度: 角度線; 僅邊界/測量刻度標記; 圓形/弧形輔助線; 對角中心線; 網格線; 多條對角線; 縫份輔助線; 裁正輔助線; 裁條輔助線; 其他
pt-BR: Régua para quilting marcações: Linhas de ângulo; Apenas marcas de borda/medição; Guias de círculo/arco; Linha central diagonal; Linhas de grade; Várias linhas diagonais; Guias de margem de costura; Guias de esquadro; Guias de corte de tiras; Outras
hu: Quiltvonalzó jelölései: Szögvonalak; Csak szegély/mérési jelölések; Kör/ív vezetők; Átlós középvonal; Rácsvonalak; Több átlós vonal; Varrásráhagyás vezetők; Négyszögesítő vezetők; Csíkvágó vezetők; Egyéb
ro-RO: Marcaje cu rigla de matlasare: Linii de unghi; Doar marcaje de margine/măsurare; Ghidaje cerc/arc; Linie centrală diagonală; Linii de grilă; Linii diagonale multiple; Ghidaje rezervă de cusătură; Ghidaje de aliniere (square-up); Ghidaje pentru tăiere fâșii; Altele
pt-PT: Marcações da régua de acolchoado: Linhas de ângulo; Apenas marcas de medição/bordo; Guias de círculo/arco; Linha central diagonal; Linhas de grelha; Várias linhas diagonais; Guias de margem de costura; Guias de esquadria; Guias de corte de tiras; Outro
de: Markierungen des Quiltlineals: Winkellinien; Nur Rand-/Messmarkierungen; Kreis-/Bogenführungen; Diagonale Mittellinie; Rasterlinien; Mehrere diagonale Linien; Nahtzugaben-Führungen; Begradigungs-Führungen; Führungen für Streifenschnitte; Sonstige
ru: Разметка линейки для квилтинга: Угловые линии; Только отметки границ/измерений; Направляющие для кругов/дуг; Диагональная центральная линия; Линии сетки; Несколько диагональных линий; Направляющие припусков на швы; Направляющие для выравнивания; Направляющие для нарезки полос; Другое
bg-BG: Маркировки на линийката за пачуърк: Линии за ъгли; Само рамка/маркери за измерване; Водачи за кръгове/дъги; Диагонална централна линия; Линии на мрежа; Множество диагонални линии; Водачи за надбавки за шев; Водачи за изравняване; Водачи за рязане на ленти; Друго
cs: Značení na prošívacím pravítku: Úhlové čáry; Pouze okrajové/měřicí značky; Vodítka pro kruhy/oblouky; Diagonální středová čára; Čáry mřížky; Několik diagonálních čar; Vodítka pro švové přídavky; Vodítka pro zarovnání; Vodítka pro řezání proužků; Jiné
tr: Kapitone cetvel işaretleri: Açı çizgileri; Sadece kenar/ölçü işaretleri; Daire/yay kılavuzları; Çapraz merkez çizgisi; Izgara çizgileri; Çoklu çapraz çizgiler; Dikiş payı kılavuzları; Kare hizalama kılavuzları; Şerit kesme kılavuzları; Diğer
sk-SK: Značenie prešívacieho pravítka: Uhlové čiary; Len okrajové/meracie značky; Kruhové/oblúkové vodiace čiary; Diagonálna stredová čiara; Čiary mriežky; Viacero diagonálnych čiar; Vodiace čiary prídavkov na švy; Zarovnávacie vodiace čiary; Vodiace čiary na rezanie pásov; Iné
ko: 퀼팅 자 눈금: 각도 선; 테두리/측정 눈금 전용; 원/호 가이드; 대각선 중앙선; 그리드 선; 다중 대각선; 시접 가이드; 스퀘어업 가이드; 스트립 절단 가이드; 기타
nl: Quiltliniaal markeringen: Hoeklijnen; Alleen rand/maatstreepjes; Cirkel/booggeleiders; Diagonale middellijn; Gridlijnen; Meerdere diagonale lijnen; Naadtoeslag-geleiders; Geleiders voor rechtzetten; Geleiders voor stroken knippen; Overig